Washington statutes.
RCW 7.88.050

Other privileges not limited, waived, or abrogated.

This chapter does not limit, waive, or abrogate the scope or nature of any other statutory or common law privilege of this state or the United States, including the attorney-client privilege.

[ 1997 c 435 s 6.]